Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1052
Attachment order in actions on claims not due; amount; specification.

The order of the court or judge granting the attachment shall specify the amount for which it is allowed, not exceeding a sum sufficient to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and the probable costs of the action.

R.S.1867, Code § 240, p. 433;

R.S.1913, § 7781;

C.S.1922, § 8725;

C.S.1929, § 20-1052;

R.S.1943, § 25-1052.

Order need not appear on face of writ. Armstrong v. Lynch, 29 Neb. 87, 45 N.W. 274 (1890).